Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 5. Shot-Firers

Cross references. —

As to explosives generally, see article 6 of this chapter.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mines and Minerals §§ 225 to 289, 328 to 366.

§ 30-2-501.
Blasting to be done by certified shot-firers or certified trona utility shot-firers; qualifications and examinations; issuance of certificate; revocation of certificate; requirements when work being done.

All blasting or shot-firing in mines, including charging and tamping of holes shall be done by or under the direct supervision of certified shot-firers. Shot-firers shall pass an oral and written examination prepared and administered by the inspector or his deputies testing knowledge of blasting and shot-firing operations and safety procedures. To take the shot-firer exam the applicant shall have at least two (2) years practical, hands-on experience in the type of operation for which he is applying. The state mine inspector shall give one (1) year experience credit for two (2) years mine engineering experience related to shot-design and shot-planning. An applicant may receive a maximum of one (1) year experience credit for mine engineering experience. Each applicant must provide verifiable documentation of his practicable experience or mining degree and experience.

The inspector or his deputies shall certify shot-firers and shall issue certificates to qualified persons. A shot-firer’s certificate may be revoked by the inspector or his deputies after notice and hearing under W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

, if the holder has violated laws governing firing of any shots or blasts, or has endangered life or property by his actions as a shot-firer.

No miner shall return to any place where shots or blasts have been fired, until given permission by the shot-firers or other mine officials authorized by law. When shot-firers are engaged in the work of firing shots, the shot-firing cable must be disconnected from battery, and cable leads must be short circuited at battery and before connection is made to detonating cap at face. All employees other than the one (1) connecting cable to cap at face are forbidden to handle battery while the work of firing shots is being carried on. The cable connecting battery to detonating cap or caps shall be not less than one hundred fifty (150) feet in length.

Blasting other than the extraction of an in-situ trona mineral for production purposes, including charging and tamping of holes, shall be done by or under the direct supervision of certified trona utility shot-firers or certified shot-firers.

Each trona utility shot-firer applicant shall:

Be at least twenty-three (23) years of age;

Have at least two (2) years mining or blasting experience before taking the trona utility shot-firer examination;

Complete and file an examination application with the state mine inspector;

Pass an oral and written examination prepared and administered by the inspector or his deputies testing knowledge of blasting and shot-firing operations and safety procedures;

Provide verifiable documentation that he has completed the training required by paragraph (ii) of this subsection and any requirement included in the trona utility blasting training plan as approved by the state mine inspector.

Each mine operator shall submit for approval by the Wyoming state mine inspector, a trona utility blasting training plan outlining training requirements, safe blasting procedures and methods. The training plan shall include a record of a practical, “hands-on” demonstration of competency. The plan shall require that no single round shall exceed one hundred fifty (150) pounds of explosives.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 34, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 23-165; Laws 1937, ch. 120, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 57-601; W.S. 1957, § 30-191; W.S. 1977, §

30-3-501

; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 1993, ch. 87, § 1; 2009, ch. 137, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (d) through (f).

§ 30-2-502.
Shots missed or not fired; report; search to recover undetonated explosive.

The shot-firer or trona utility shot-firer shall immediately after the completion of his work, report in writing to the proper official, any shots missed or not fired, their location and the reason therefor.

A misfired shot shall be handled under the direct supervision of the mine foreman or a certified person designated by him.

A search by the mine foreman or certified person designated by him of the working place, and, if necessary, the material, shall be made after blasting a misfired hole to recover undetonated explosive.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 34, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 23-166; C.S. 1945, § 57-602; Laws 1951, ch. 128, § 22; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-192, 30-247; W.S. 1977, §§

30-3-502

, 30-6-109; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2009, ch. 137, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “or trona utility shot-firer” following “The shot-firer” in (a).

§ 30-2-503.
Prohibited acts.

No person shall alter or change any drill hole after it has been approved by the shot-firer or the trona utility shot-firer.

No shot-firer or trona utility shot-firer, whether voluntarily or by command or request of any person, shall fire any unlawful shot, or any shot which is not a workmanlike, proper and practical shot.

No person shall order, command or induce any shot-firer or trona utility shot-firer to fire any unlawful shot, or any shot which is not a workmanlike, proper and practical shot.

No person shall drill or shoot a dead hole. A “dead hole” is a hole where the width of the shot at the point measured at right angles to the line of hole is so great that the heel is not of sufficient strength to at least balance the resistance at the point. The “heel” means that part of the shot which lies outside of the collar.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 34, §§ 4 to 6; R.S. 1931, §§ 23-168 to 23-170; C.S. 1945, §§ 57-604 to 57-606; W.S. 1957, §§ 30-194 to 30-196; W.S. 1977, §§

30-3-504

to 30-3-506; Laws 1983, ch. 11, § 2; 2009, ch. 137, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “or the trona utility shot-firer” or similar language in (a) through (c).

Repealing clauses. —

Section 9, ch. 34, Laws 1929, repealed ch. 61, Laws 1923, and ch. 67, Laws 1925.